Maine, session 132, LD595.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to further update certain consumer privacy laws in response to recent
developments in federal and state consumer privacy laws.
Page 1 - 132LR1560(01)